Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.005

Intent.

The legislature intends to:

(1) Recognize that music therapy affects public health, safety, and welfare and that the practice of music therapy should be subject to regulation;

(2) Assure the highest degree of professional conduct on the part of music therapists;

(3) Guarantee the availability of music therapy services provided by a qualified professional to persons in need of those services; and

(4) Protect the public from the practice of music therapy by unqualified individuals.

[ 2023 c 175 s 1.]